North Dakota, session 69, SB2143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-51.1-07.9 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
57-51.1-07.9. State energy research center fund - Continuing appropriation. (Effective
through June 30, 20292033)
The state energy research center fund is a special fund in the state treasury. Before depositing oil
and gas gross production tax and oil extraction tax revenues under section 57-51.1-07.5, one percent of
the revenues must be deposited monthly into the state energy research center fund, up to seven million
five hundred thousand dollars per biennium. All moneys deposited in the state energy research center
fund and interest on all such moneys are appropriated on a continuing basis to the industrial
commission for distribution to the state energy research center. The state energy research center shall
use the funds in accordance with section 15-11-40.

S. B. NO. 2143 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2143.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 5 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State